Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,142.01
Violations; Attorney General; duties.

The State Athletic Commissioner may inform the Attorney General of any violations of sections 81-8,129 to 81-8,142.01, and may request the Attorney General to prosecute persons committing such violations. The Attorney General shall be authorized upon receipt of the request by the commissioner, to take the appropriate legal action, whether civil or criminal.

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 19.